South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S728.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120(57)(a) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (57)(a) sales taking place during a period beginning 12:01 a.m. on the first Friday in AugustAugust first and ending at twelve midnight the following SundayAugust thirty-first of: (i) clothing; (ii) clothing accessories including, but not limited to, hats, scarves, hosiery, and handbags; (iii) footwear; (iv) school supplies including, but not limited to, pens, pencils, paper, binders, notebooks, books, bookbags, lunchboxes, and calculators; (v) computers, printers and printer supplies, and computer software; (vi) bath wash clothes, blankets, bed spreads, bed linens, sheet sets, comforter sets, bath towels, shower curtains, bath rugs and mats, pillows, and pillow cases. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----